Hawaii, session 2026, GM1355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 481B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
”§481B- Smart household security devices; data sharing
with law enforcement; prohibition; penalties. (a) An operator
shall not share smart household security device user data with a
law enforcement agency unless:
(1) The user consents in writing to share their data with
a law enforcement agency;
(2) The law enforcement agency provides the operator with
a judicial warrant requiring the operator to share the
data with the law enforcement agency; or
(3) There is an emergency situation; provided that:
(A) The emergency involves a clear and present danger
of imminent death or serious bodily harm to a
person or persons resulting from a kidnapping, an
2026-2414 SB888 CDl SMA.docx
liHIHHINIIIIIIIiMIHI

Page 2 S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
abduction, or the holding of a hostage by force
or the threat of the imminent use of force;
(B) There was no prior notice of the emergency
sufficient to obtain prior judicial approval, and
the law enforcement officer reasonably believes
that an order permitting the obtaining of smart
household security device data would be issued
were there prior judicial review;
(C) The smart household security device data is
necessary and the only potential data available
to prevent imminent death or serious bodily harm
to a person or persons; and
(D) The smart household security device data must and
can be accessed before a judicial warrant could
be issued to prevent imminent death or serious
bodily harm to a person or persons.
(b) An operator shall not require a user to consent to the
sharing of smart household security device data with a law
enforcement agency as a condition of using a smart household
security device. An operator shall clearly and conspicuously
inform the user, through a visible disclaimer, that the user is
2026-2414 SB888 GDI SMA.docx

Page 3 S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
not required to consent to sharing data with a law enforcement
agency and that refusing to consent will not terminate the
user's ability to use the smart household security device.
(c) Any violation of this section shall be deemed an
unfair or deceptive act or practice in trade or commerce in
violation of chapter 480.
(d) The attorney general may bring an action based on a
violation of this section to recover all of the following
relief:
(1) Injunctive relief;
(2) Damages in an amount equal to the greater of:
(A) Actual damages; or
(B) A civil penalty in accordance with section
480-3.1; and
(3) Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
(e) Notwithstanding section 480-2 or any law to the
contrary, and notwithstanding subsection (f), no person,
including a consumer, may bring a private action to enforce this
section or a private action under any other law based on a
violation of this section.
2026-2414 SB888 CDl SMA.docx 3
IIIIHIIIIIIIIHIIMIIIIillllll

Page 4 S.B. NO 888
S.D. 2
H.D.2
C.D. 1
(f) The duties, remedies, and obligations imposed by this
section shall be cumulative to the duties, remedies, or
obligations imposed under other law and shall not be construed
to relieve an operator from any duties, remedies, or obligations
imposed under any other law.
(g) For the purposes of this section:
"Judicial warrant" means an order in writing or otherwise
pursuant to section 803-33.5 made by a judge or other
magistrate, or a warrant issued pursuant to Rule 41 of the
Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure.
"Law enforcement agency" means any county police
department, the department of law enforcement, and any federal,
state, or county public body that employs law enforcement
officers.
"Law enforcement officer" means any public servant, whether
employed by the United States, the State, or a county, who is
vested by law with a duty to maintain public order or to make
arrests for offenses or to enforce the criminal laws, whether
that duty extends to all offenses or is limited to a specific
class of offenses.
2026-2414 SB888 CDl SMA.docx
IMIHIIIIIMIIillinillillMI

Page 5 S.B. NO. "2
C.D. 1
"Operator" means a person who develops^ makes available, or
operates a smart household security device for the public and
who collects, retains, or controls access to smart household
security device data associated with a user account profile.
"Operator" does not include a retail store solely because the
retail store provides access to or sells a smart household
security device.
"Smart household security device" means a device primarily
intended for residential security or monitoring that;
(1) Is installed or affixed to a residential dwelling,
accessory structure, or entryway;
(2) Continuously or intermittently captures visual images
o£a udio recordlji2®2°^L^2th j and
(3) Enables storage, transmission, or remote access to the
recordings through a digital networked system.
"Smart household security device" does not include a personal
computing device, tablet, or mobile phone when used incidentally
for recording; a device used solely for live two-way
communication without recording capability; or a device owned or
operated by a government entity for public surveillance.
2026-2414 SB888 CDl SMA.docx
nHimMHUBiigiwiHiiiHi

Page 6
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
"User” means a person who has, or generates, an account or
profile to use a smart household security device.”
SECTION 2. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2414 SB888 CDl SMA.docx
HllilllHIIIIililWlllllllil

888
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 14th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 888, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, HawaiT 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
47-26

SB No. 888, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives